Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-1211 Exemption from costs.
All proceedings under this part shall be free from all costs of court, except
that the clerk may charge the actual expenses for advertising the notice
specified in section 560:3-1206, the advertising, posting, or service fees
required in carrying out any order of the court, including orders relating to
the sale of real or personal property, and any expenses reasonably necessary
for the preservation, disposal, distribution, and administration of the estate,
together with a fee of three per cent of the market value of the first $100,000
in the gross estate, the fee to be paid into the treasury of the State as a
government realization from any available assets of the estate; provided that
if the administration is completed by another personal representative on
account of the size of the estate or for any other reason, no fee shall be
charged by the clerk. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 48, §8]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next